Illinois, session 104th, HB1359.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Protecting Illinois Native Landscapes Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Illinois native species" means trees, shrubs, vines, 8ferns, flowers, forbs, sedges, grasses, and other plants 9growing in the State of Illinois prior to European settlement 10or as otherwise defined by rule of the Department of Natural 11Resources. 12    "Native landscape" means an intentionally maintained area 13of grasses, wildflowers, forbs, ferns, shrubs, or trees 14comprised primarily of Illinois native species as verified by 15a unit of local government or by a nonprofit land trust that is 16nationally accredited by the Land Trust Alliance. "Native 17landscape" includes Illinois native species that are in excess 18of 8 inches in height and have gone to seed. "Native landscape" 19does not include exotic or noxious weeds regulated under the 20Illinois Noxious Weed Law, the Illinois Exotic Weed Act, or an 21ordinance or resolution of a unit of local government. 22    Section 10. Regulations restricting Illinois native   HB1359- 2 -LRB104 06893 RTM 16929 b1species.2    (a) A unit of local government may not enact or enforce an 3ordinance or resolution that prohibits or unreasonably 4restricts an owner, authorized agent, or authorized occupant 5of privately owned residential land or a premises from 6allowing Illinois native species to voluntarily grow within 7the landscape or to install and maintain Illinois native 8species within a managed native landscape.9    (b) Native landscaping that may not be prohibited include 10small or large areas of native landscaping in the front, back, 11or side yard or in areas that do not fit a standard definition 12of yard, such as areas on farms, rural properties, corporate 13campuses, school campuses, and large estates. 14    Section 15. Exceptions. This Act does not apply to an 15ordinance or resolution of a unit of local government that 16prohibits plants, trees, or other landscaping from interfering 17with public transportation, vehicular traffic, or driveway or 18entrance road sight lines or from crossing sidewalks or 19property boundaries. 20    Section 20. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 21Illinois native species and native landscapes in a manner 22inconsistent with this Act. This Act is a limitation under 23subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 24Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule units of   HB1359- 3 -LRB104 06893 RTM 16929 b1powers and functions exercised by the State.